Indiana, session 2026, HB1151.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 1-1-8.1-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. (a) The state, acting under the exemption
provision of the Uniform Time Act of 1966 (15 U.S.C. 260a(a)), is
exempt from the federal provisions that establish daylight saving
time.
(b) The governor and the general assembly hereby petition the
United States Department of Transportation to initiate proceedings
under the Uniform Time Act of 1966 to move the entire state to
central standard time.
(c) The standard times within the state shall be the time known
and designated by the Uniform Time Act of 1966 as central
standard time.
(d) A state department or agency, or any county, city, or other
political subdivision, may not employ any other time or adopt any:
(1) statute;
(2) ordinance; or
2026 IN 1151—LS 6629/DI 137


(3) order;
providing for daylight saving time.
SECTION 2. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) To implement
IC 1-1-8.1-0.5, as added by this act, the governor shall, not later
than ten (10) days after the governor files this act with the
secretary of state, send a copy of this act along with any other
necessary documentation prescribed by the United States
Department of Transportation to the appropriate official of the
United States Department of Transportation.
(b) This SECTION expires January 1, 2027.
2026 IN 1151—LS 6629/DI 137